Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-2444
Automated Medication Systems Act, how cited.

Sections 71-2444 to 71-2452 shall be known and may be cited as the Automated Medication Systems Act.

Laws 2008, LB308, § 1;

Laws 2013, LB326, § 3;

Laws 2026, LB912, § 30.
May 1, 2027